Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1,113
Bonds; extension of maturity; refunding; election required, when; procedure; laws applicable.

No bonds shall be issued or contract entered into under the provisions of section 46-1,112 unless the same shall be authorized by a majority vote of the electors of such district at any general or special election held in such district. Such election shall be held pursuant to resolution of the board of directors calling the same, and the provisions of law governing the holding of elections to vote bonds in irrigation districts are hereby made applicable to elections held under this section.

Laws 1917, c. 190, § 2, p. 464;

C.S.1922, § 2931;

C.S.1929, § 46-176;

R.S.1943, § 46-1,113.